Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-610.01
Subpoena; witness; service; failure to appear; contempt of court.

In criminal misdemeanor cases the clerk may issue writs of subpoena to the witness named therein by mailing it to such person by certified mail to the last-known residence of such person or, if such address is unknown, to the last-known business address of such person. The person making such service shall make a return thereof showing the manner and proof of service. If any such witness shall fail to appear at the time and place required by the subpoena, such witness may be deemed to be in contempt of court upon a showing of actual notice.

Laws 1974, LB 684, § 1.